Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.180

Violation—Misdemeanor.

Any person who violates or participates in the violation of any provision of the rules or orders of the director or of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1994 c 92 s 290; 1991 c 355 s 18.]